Utah statutes.
73-28-302.   Limits on amount of water available to any district --
Exception.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the total amount of developed water
that the board may make available to any district is limited as follows:
(a)  The Kane Water Conservancy District may purchase no more than 10,000
acre-feet of developed water per calendar year.
(b)  The Washington County Water Conservancy District may purchase no more
than 69,000 acre-feet of developed water per calendar year.
(c)  The Central Iron County Water Conservancy District may purchase no more
than the amount of Colorado River water it acquires.
(2) (a)  A district may purchase developed water in excess of the limits
specified in Subsection (1) for that calendar year if:
(i)  developed water is available; and
(ii)  no other district eligible to receive the developed water has offered to
purchase it.
(b)  The board may expand the size of the project and exceed the limits in
Subsection (1) if the board or a district acquires additional water rights.
(3)  Before beginning the final design of the project, the board shall make
rules establishing a reasonable time during which the districts may offer to
purchase developed water.
(4)  If the Central Iron County Water Conservancy District acquires water
rights and participates in the project, the board shall ensure that:
(a)  the project is sized and constructed to transport the Central Iron County
Water Conservancy District's water from Lake Powell; and
(b)  facilities from Washington County to Cedar City are included in the
project.
